Utah statutes.
9-9-211.   Hunting, trapping, or fishing on reservation a misdemeanor.

Any person who, without lawful authority or permission from constituted tribal authorities, willfully and knowingly goes upon any real property within an Indian reservation belonging to any Indian, or any Indian tribe, band, or community, that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States, for the purpose of hunting, trapping, or fishing thereon, or for the removal of game, peltries, or fish therefrom, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and all game, fish and peltries in his possession shall be forfeited to the tribe.

